Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MEDICAL ASSISTANCE COVERAGE OF TRADITIONAL HEALTH CARE PRACTICES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Waiver request. new text end new text begin By October 1, 2025, the commissioner of human services, in consultation with Tribes, Tribal organizations, and urban Indian organizations, shall apply to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for a waiver to allow the state's medical assistance program to provide coverage for traditional health care practices received through Indian health service facilities, facilities operated by Tribes or Tribal organizations under the Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act, or facilities operated by urban Indian organizations under Title V of the Indian Health Care Improvement Act. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A qualified provider must determine whether a medical assistance enrollee is eligible to receive traditional health care practices under this section. new text end new text begin (b) Traditional health care practices are covered under this section if they are received from a qualified provider. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this section, a "qualified provider" is a practitioner or provider who is employed by or under contract with the Indian Health Service, a 638 Tribal clinic, or a Title V urban Indian organization. Each facility is responsible for ensuring that a qualified provider has the necessary experience and appropriate training to provide traditional health care practices. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Payments for traditional health care practices. new text end new text begin Reimbursement for traditional health care practices under this section is set at the outpatient, per visit rate established by the Indian Health Service under sections 321(a) and 322(b) of the Public Health Service Act. Reimbursement is limited to one payment per day per medical assistance enrollee receiving traditional health care practices. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later, except that subdivision 1, is effective the day following final enactment. The commissioner of human services must notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end